Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 5. Additional Provisions Applicable to Consumer Credit.

§ 6.2-436.
Compliance with federal law.

Every person subject to the provisions of 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq. and Consumer Financial Protection Bureau Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. Part 1026) shall comply with such statutes and regulations when offering or extending consumer credit as defined therein. A lender who fails to comply with this section shall not be subject to any liability or penalty beyond those imposed by such federal statutes and regulations.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.79; 2010, c. 794; 2016, c. 501.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 501, substituted “Consumer Financial Protection Bureau” for “Federal Reserve Board,” and “1026” for “226.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

State law claims are precluded where conduct underlying claim is regulated by federal law. —

A claim under former Chapter 7.3 of Title 6.1 [now see §

6.2-436

] is limited substantively and procedurally to the remedies and recovery allowed by federal law; thus, a borrower who disputes a lender’s ability to establish a cut-off hour or the reasonableness of the hour for posting payments to his account is limited by the statute to seeking redress under federal law and cannot recast his claim under other state law theories. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William C. Mims, Member, Senate of Virginia, 01-079, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 28 (9/12/01).

§ 6.2-437.
Right of buyer of consumer goods to refinance certain payments; agreements as to fluctuation in schedule of payments.

In any sales transaction, except one pursuant to an open-end account, involving exclusively consumer goods as defined in subdivision (a)(23) of §

8.9A-102

in which credit is extended and a security interest in consumer goods is taken, any installment payment, other than a down payment made prior to or contemporaneously with the execution of an agreement evidencing the transaction, that is more than 10 percent greater than the regular or recurring installment payments, shall be subject to the buyer’s right to refinance such a payment on the basis of an extended period of time. Such additional payments shall be in amounts that shall allow the unpaid balance to be paid in as few periodic payments, not more than 10 percent greater than the regularly scheduled installment payments, as are required to pay such balance. Such additional payments shall be considered and treated as part of the original transaction.

The parties may agree in a separate writing that one or more payments or the intervals between one or more payments shall be reduced or expanded in accordance with the desires or needs of the buyer, if such fluctuations in the schedule of payments are expressly arranged to coincide with the anticipated fluctuations in the buyer’s capability to make such payments.

No seller who has refused to refinance in compliance with the provisions of this section shall be entitled (i) to the return or repossession of the goods involved in the transaction or (ii) to a judgment for the unpaid balance involved in the transaction at the time of his failure to do so.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.90; 2010, c. 794.